Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,150
Refund; application; when; contents; hearing; approval.

(1) An application for a refund of Nebraska sales and use taxes paid for any air or water pollution control facility may be filed with the Tax Commissioner by the owner of such facility in such manner and in such form as may be prescribed by the commissioner. The application for a refund shall contain: (a) Plans and specifications of such facility including all materials incorporated therein; (b) a descriptive list of all equipment acquired by the applicant for the purpose of industrial or agricultural waste pollution control; (c) the proposed operating procedure for the facility; (d) the acquisition cost of the facility for which a refund is claimed; and (e) a copy of the final findings of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment issued pursuant to section 77-27,151.

(2) The Tax Commissioner shall offer an applicant a hearing upon request of such applicant. The hearing shall not affect the authority of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment to determine whether or not industrial or agricultural waste pollution control exists within the meaning of the Air and Water Pollution Control Tax Refund Act.

(3) A claim for refund received without a copy of the final findings of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment issued pursuant to section 77-27,151 shall not be considered a valid claim and shall be returned to the applicant.

(4) Notice of the Tax Commissioner's refusal to issue a refund shall be mailed to the applicant.

Laws 1972, LB 716, § 2;

Laws 1974, LB 820, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 308, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 244, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 43;

Laws 2002, LB 989, § 20;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 45;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 96;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 389.